Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.508

Child care facility fund committee—Loans to child care facilities.

The child care facility fund committee is authorized, upon application, to use the child care facility fund to guarantee loans made to persons, businesses, or organizations to start a licensed child care facility, or to make capital improvements in an existing licensed child care facility.

(1) Loan guarantees shall be awarded on a one-time only basis, and shall not be awarded for loans to cover operating expenses beyond the first three months of business.

(2) The total aggregate amount of the loan guarantee awarded to any applicant may not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars and may not exceed eighty percent of the loan.

(3) The total aggregate amount of guarantee from the child care facility fund, with respect to the guaranteed portions of loans, may not exceed at any time an amount equal to five times the balance in the child care facility fund.

[ 1989 c 430 s 6.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—1989 c 430: See notes following RCW 43.31.502.